District of Columbia statutes.
50-2301.03

Repealed

Bureau of Traffic Adjudication and Bureau of Parking and Enforcement established.

Repealed.

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 103, 25 DCR 1275
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 302(b), 48 DCR 2057
1981 Ed., § 40-603.
1973 Ed., § 40-1103.
The functions of the Department of Transportation were transferred to the Department of Public Works by Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984.